test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_toollad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup



Tests: 

  Verb - toollâđ: # MLO checked
    toollâđ+V+Inf: toollâđ
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toolâm 
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toolah
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálá 
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuálleen
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tolâvettee
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toollâv
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toollâp
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tolâvetteđ
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuálih
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: toollim
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: toollih
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toolâi
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tooláim
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tooláid
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tooláin
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toolâim
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toolâid
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tollii
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tuáleem
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tuáleeh
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: toolâš
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tolâžeen
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: toolâšvettee
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tolâžává
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tolâžep
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: toolâšvetteđ
    toollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tolâžeh
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toolâ
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tuálus
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tuálloon
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tuállee
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tuállus
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tuállup
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toollâđ
    toollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tuállus


  Verb - sooppâđ: # MLO checked
    sooppâđ+V+Inf: sooppâđ
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovâm 
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: soovah
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suápá 
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: suáppeen
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: sopâvettee
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: sooppâv
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sooppâp
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sopâvetteđ
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: suápih
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sooppim
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sooppih
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: soovâi
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: soováim
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: soováid
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: soováin
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: soovâim
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: soovâid
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: soppii
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: suáveem
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: suáveeh
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: soovâš
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: sovâžeen
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: soovâšvettee
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: sovâžává
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: sovâžep
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: soovâšvetteđ
    sooppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: sovâžeh
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: soovâ
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: suávus
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: suáppoon
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: suáppee
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: suáppus
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: suáppup
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sooppâđ
    sooppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: suáppus
